Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2708
Estates, guardianships,
conservatorships, and trusts; real estate; certificate of pending proceeding;
filing; county judge; duties;
guardian or conservator; filing required.

In
any proceeding in the county court involving (1) the probate of wills, (2)
the administration of estates, (3) the determination of heirs, (4) the determination
of inheritance tax, (5) guardianships, (6) conservatorships, where real estate
is any part of the assets of the estate or proceeding, or (7) trusts, where
real estate is specifically described as an asset of the trust, the county
judge before whom the proceeding is pending shall issue a certificate which
shall be filed with the register of deeds of the county in which the real
estate is located within ten days after the description of the real estate
is filed in the proceeding. A
guardian or conservator shall file a copy of his or her letters with the register
of deeds in every county in which the ward has real property or an interest
in real property. The certificate shall be in the following form:

This is to certify that there is pending in the county court
of ........................... County, a proceeding .........................................................

(describe proceeding and name of person involved)

in which the following described real estate is involved,
to wit:

.........................................................

(describe real estate)

............................................

County Judge

Laws 1969, c. 240, § 1, p. 885;

Laws 1971, LB 41, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,1971, § 24-562.01;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 59;

Laws 1975, LB 481, § 7;

Laws 1980, LB 694, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-559;

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 117;

Laws 2011, LB157, § 1.